Utah statutes.
75-5-103.   Delegation of powers by parent or guardian.

A parent or a guardian of a minor or incapacitated person, by a properly-executed power of attorney, may delegate to another person, for a period not exceeding six months, any of his powers regarding care, custody, or property of the minor child or ward, except his power to consent to marriage or adoption of a minor ward.



Enacted by Chapter 150, 1975 General Session

